North Carolina, session 2025, SB721.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 15A-304(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) When Issued. –
…
(3) When Citizen-initiated. – If the finding of probable cause pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section is based solely upon an affidavit or oral
testimony under oath or affirmation of a person who is not a sworn law
enforcement officer, the issuing official shall not issue a warrant for arrest and
instead shall issue a criminal summons, unless one of the following
circumstances exists:a crime of domestic violence, as defined in G.S. 50B-1,
is alleged.
a. There is corroborating testimony of the facts establishing probable
cause from a sworn law enforcement officer or at least one
disinterested witness.
b. The official finds that obtaining investigation of the alleged offense by
a law enforcement agency would constitute a substantial burden for
the complainant.
c. The official finds substantial evidence of one or more of the
circumstances listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection."
SECTION 2. This act is effective October 1, 2025, and applies to criminal processes
issued on or after that date.
*S721-v-1*